Washington statutes.
RCW 10.98.010

Purpose.

The purpose of this chapter is to provide a system of reporting and disseminating felony criminal justice information that provides: (1) Timely and accurate criminal histories for filing and sentencing under the sentencing reform act of 1981, (2) identification and tracking of felons, and (3) data for statewide planning and forecasting of the felon population.

[ 1984 c 17 s 1.]